Utah statutes.
58-37f-302.   Other restrictions on access to database.

(1)  A person who is a relative of a deceased individual is not entitled to access information from the database relating to the deceased individual based on the fact or claim that the person is:

(a)  related to the deceased individual; or

(b)  subrogated to the rights of the deceased individual.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), data provided to, maintained in, or accessed from the database that may be identified to, or with, a particular person is not subject to discovery, subpoena, or similar compulsory process in any civil, judicial, administrative, or legislative proceeding, nor shall any individual or organization with lawful access to the data be compelled to testify with regard to the data.

(3)  The restrictions described in Subsection (2) do not apply to a civil, judicial, or administrative action brought to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

